Idaho, session 2026, S1279.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-619, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-619. STARTER HOME SUBDIVISIONS -- RESTRICTIVE COVENANTS PROHIB-
ITED. (1) On and after July 1, 2026, no restrictive covenant shall be entered
into that strictly prohibits or unreasonably restricts the construction of
starter home subdivisions as provided in section 67-6541, Idaho Code. Any
such covenant is hereby declared to be against public policy and is void and
unenforceable. Any person attempting to create or enforce such a covenant
shall be subject to a cause of action and liable for any attorney's fees,
court costs, and any other damages incurred by the other party.
(2) This section shall not apply to restrictive covenants against
starter home subdivisions as provided in section 67-6541, Idaho Code, that
are entered into prior to July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 32, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-3214, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-3214. STARTER HOME SUBDIVISIONS. No covenant, condition, or re-
striction may be added, amended, or enforced by a homeowner's association
or any other parties in such a way that strictly prohibits or unreasonably
restricts starter home subdivisions as provided in section 67-6541, Idaho
Code. This section shall not affect any such covenant, condition, or re-
striction in effect prior to July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


67-6541. STARTER HOME SUBDIVISIONS. (1) No county or city shall enact
or enforce any ordinance within its jurisdiction that bans starter home sub-
divisions in any residential zoning area. "Starter home subdivision" means
a proposed new subdivision for single-family dwellings located on vacant or
undeveloped land that is at least four (4) acres in size.
(2) By resolution or ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed in accor-
dance with the notice and hearing procedures provided in section 67-6509,
Idaho Code, each governing board shall amend its comprehensive plan and land
use regulations for all land zoned for single-family residential use, except
for lands falling within an area defined as a historic district in section
67-4607, Idaho Code, to:
(a) Prohibit requiring minimum lot sizes exceeding one thousand
(1,000) square feet for lots located in starter home subdivisions;
(b) Prohibit requiring front or rear setbacks exceeding fifteen (15)
feet or side setbacks exceeding five (5) feet for a primary residential
structure on a lot;
(c) Prohibit requiring lot front widths exceeding thirty (30) feet for
narrow lots;
(d) Prohibit requiring lot depths exceeding seventy (70) feet, unless
overall lot shape, topography, or environmental or infrastructure con-
straints require it;
(e) Allow density of at least twelve (12) dwelling units per lot acre
unless infrastructure limitations, lot configuration, or environmen-
tal constraints make it unfeasible; and
(f) Prohibit imposing permit fees, development impact fees, or util-
ity connection fees for starter home subdivisions exceeding those that
would be imposed on other single-family home subdivisions. A local
government may provide incentives to builders through fee reductions or
waivers for compliance with smaller lot and setback options.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not supersede state or local
laws that protect public health, safety, and welfare, including:
(a) Building codes, fire safety standards, and flood plain regula-
tions;
(b) Laws regarding water, sewer, storm drainage, road access, and util-
ity services necessary to support the required density; and
(c) Laws regarding environmental hazards, aquifer recharge zones,
steep slopes, or critical habitat protections.
(4) A property owner, housing developer, or other affected party may
bring a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief
available under law to enforce compliance with the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 4. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.


SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.